Washington statutes.
RCW 43.52.590

Construction of RCW 43.52.560 through 43.52.585.

Nothing in RCW 43.52.560 through 43.52.585 requires reapplication by a joint operating agency in existence on July 26, 1987.

[ 1987 c 376 s 7.]